Washington statutes.
RCW 13.40.468

Juvenile rehabilitation administration—State quality assurance program.

The department shall establish a state quality assurance program. The department shall monitor the implementation of intervention services funded pursuant to *RCW 13.40.466 and shall evaluate adherence to service model design and service completion rate.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 620; 2006 c 304 s 6.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 13.40.466 was repealed by 2023 c 41 s 1.

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 ss 601-631, 701-728, and 804: See note following RCW 13.04.011.

Conflict with federal requirements—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6: See RCW 43.216.908.

Finding—Intent—Entitlement not created—Effective date—2006 c 304: See notes following RCW 13.40.462.